Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 4. Creation, validity, modification, and termination of trust.

§ 91-8-401.
Methods of creating trust.

A trust may be created by:

Transfer of property to another person as trustee or a transfer in the name of the trust during the settlor’s lifetime or by will or other disposition taking effect upon the settlor’s death;

Declaration by the owner of property that the owner holds identifiable property as trustee;

Exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a trustee;

A court pursuant to its statutory or equitable powers; or

By an agent or attorney-in-fact under a power of attorney that:

Expressly grants authority to create the trust; or

Grants the agent or attorney-in-fact the authority to act in the management and disposition of the principal’s property that is as broad or comprehensive as the principal could exercise for himself or herself and that does not expressly exclude the authority to create a trust. An agent or attorney-in-fact may file a petition for the court to determine whether a power of attorney described in this section grants the agent or attorney-in-fact authority that is as broad or comprehensive as that which the principal could exercise for himself or herself.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 23; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-402.
Requirements for creation.

A trust is created only if:

The settlor has capacity to create a trust;

The settlor indicates an intention to create the trust;

The trust has a definite beneficiary or is:

A charitable trust;

A trust for the care of an animal, as provided in Section 91-8-408; or

A trust for a noncharitable purpose, as provided in Section 91-8-409;

The trustee has duties to perform; and

The same person is not the sole trustee and sole beneficiary.

A beneficiary is definite if the beneficiary can be ascertained now or in the future, subject to any applicable rule against perpetuities.

A power in a trustee to select a beneficiary from an indefinite class is valid. If the power is not exercised within a reasonable time, the power fails and the property subject to the power passes to the persons who would have taken the property had the power not been conferred.

A settlor is deemed to have the capacity to create a trust if:

The trust is created by an agent of the settlor under a power of attorney as described in Section 91-8-401(5); and

The settlor had capacity to create a trust at the time the power of attorney was executed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-403.
Trusts created in other jurisdictions.

A trust not created by will is validly created if its creation complies with the law of the jurisdiction in which the trust instrument was executed, or the law of the jurisdiction in which, at the time of creation:

The settlor was domiciled, had a place of abode, or was a national;

A trustee was domiciled or had a place of business; or

Any trust property was located.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-404.
Trust purposes.

A trust may be created only to the extent its purposes are lawful and possible to achieve. A trust and its terms must be for the benefit of its beneficiaries as the interests of such beneficiaries are defined under the terms of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-405.
Charitable purposes; enforcement.

A charitable trust may be created for the relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, governmental or municipal purposes, or other purposes the achievement of which is beneficial to the community.

If the terms of a charitable trust do not indicate a particular charitable purpose or beneficiary, the court may select one or more charitable purposes or beneficiaries. The selection must be consistent with the settlor’s intention to the extent it can be ascertained.

The settlor of a charitable trust, among others, may maintain a proceeding to enforce the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-406.
Creation of trust induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

A trust is void to the extent its creation was induced by fraud, duress, or undue influence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-407.
Evidence of oral trust; trust in land.

Except as provided in subsection (b) and except as required by a statute other than this chapter, a trust need not be evidenced by a trust instrument, but the creation of an oral trust and its terms may be established only by clear and convincing evidence.

(1) No trust of or in any real property can be created except by a written instrument signed by the party who declares or creates such trust (the “settlor”), or by his last will, in writing. Every writing declaring or creating a trust in real property, other than a last will, may be acknowledged and proved as other writing and filed for record with the clerk of the chancery court in which the real property, or part of it, is located, and the filing shall serve as constructive notice of the existence and terms of the trust from and after filing.

In lieu of filing the trust instrument or other writing declaring or creating a trust in real property, there may be filed with the clerk of the chancery court in which the real property, or part of it, is located a memorandum of trust signed by the settlor, trustee, or successor trustee and acknowledged or proved as other writings and the filing of the memorandum of trust shall serve as constructive notice of the existence and terms of the trust from and after filing. The memorandum shall contain substantially all of the following information:

The name of the trust;

The street and mailing address of the office, and the name and street and mailing address and telephone number of the trustee;

The name and street and mailing address and telephone number of the settlor of the trust;

A legally sufficient description of all interests in real property owned by or conveyed to the trust;

The anticipated date of termination of the trust or the event upon which the trust will be terminated; and

The general powers granted to the trustee, which may be by reference to the statutory powers granted to the trustee under the terms of the trust instrument.

The memorandum may also contain the name and street and mailing address and telephone number of any successor trustee. The memorandum of trust may be filed with the clerk of the appropriate chancery court either before or after a deed of conveyance of real property to the trust or trustee, in his capacity as such. The memorandum need not comply with subparagraph (D) if filed before or contemporaneously with a conveyance of any real property to the trust or trustee in his capacity as such, and need not be amended upon a subsequent conveyance of real property to the trust or trustee in his capacity as such, so long as the deed of conveyance is recorded in the appropriate county, and the recording of the deed of conveyance to the trust or trustee, as the case may be, shall constitute compliance with subparagraph (D). In addition, the deed of conveyance may also serve as a memorandum of trust, or an amendment to the memorandum of trust, as the case may be, so long as the deed of conveyance contains the information required for a memorandum of trust as set forth in this subsection (b).

The settlor may amend the memorandum if the trust to which it relates is subject to a power of amendment or revocation by the settlor; otherwise, only the then-serving trustee may amend the memorandum. The memorandum of amendment shall set forth the amendment to the original memorandum with particularity. The amended memorandum of trust may be made effective on a future date, which must be a date certain. The memorandum of amendment may be signed by the creator, trustee or successor trustee, as the case may be, and acknowledged or proved as other writings and filed for record with the clerk of the chancery court where the original memorandum is of record. The filing of the memorandum of amendment shall serve as constructive notice of the existence and terms of the amendment from and after filing.

The provision of Sections 89-5-24 and 89-5-33 shall apply to any trust instrument, memorandum, or amendment that is to be recorded under this subsection (b).

The provisions of this subsection (b) shall have no application to trusts of personal property, or to any trust arising or resulting by implication of law out of a conveyance of land. The failure to file a copy of the trust instrument, memorandum or deed of conveyance shall not affect the validity of the trust or the trust instrument.

A certificate of trust containing the information set forth in Section 91-9-7 that was filed before July 1, 2014, shall be considered constructive notice of the existence and terms of the trust from and after its filing, and the filing of a memorandum of trust under this subsection (b) shall not be necessary.

(1) All property originally brought into the trust or subsequently acquired by purchase or otherwise, on account of the trust, is trust property.

Unless the contrary intention appears, property acquired with trust funds is trust property.

Any estate in real property may be acquired in the trust name. Title so acquired can be conveyed in the trust name or by the trustees, as trustees of the trust.

A conveyance to a trust in the trust name, though without words of inheritance, passes the entire interest in the property of the grantor unless the language of the conveyance reflects an intent to the contrary.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 29; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-408.
Trust for care of animal.

A trust may be created to provide for the care of an animal alive during the settlor’s lifetime. The trust terminates upon the death of the animal or, if the trust was created to provide for the care of more than one (1) animal alive during the settlor’s lifetime, upon the death of the last surviving animal.

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person appointed in the terms of the trust or, if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court. In addition, a person having a demonstrated interest in the welfare of the animal may request the court to appoint a person to enforce the trust or to remove a person appointed.

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use must be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor’s successors in interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-409.
Noncharitable trust without ascertainable beneficiary.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 91-8-408, Section 41-43-51 or by another statute, the following rules apply:

A trust may be created for a noncharitable purpose without a definite or definitely ascertainable beneficiary or for a noncharitable but otherwise valid purpose to be selected by the trustee. The trust may not be enforced for more than twenty-one (21) years;

A trust authorized by this section may be enforced by a person appointed under the terms of the trust, or if no person is so appointed, by a person appointed by the court.

Property of a trust authorized by this section may be applied only to its intended use, except to the extent the court determines that the value of the trust property exceeds the amount required for the intended use. Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, property not required for the intended use must be distributed to the settlor, if then living, otherwise to the settlor’s successors in interest.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 31; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-410.
Modification or termination of trust; proceedings for approval or disapproval.

In addition to the methods of termination prescribed by Sections 91-8-411 through 91-8-414, a trust terminates to the extent the trust is revoked or expires pursuant to its terms, no purpose of the trust remains to be achieved, or the purposes of the trust have become unlawful or impossible to achieve.

A proceeding to approve or disapprove a proposed modification or termination under Sections 91-8-411 through 91-8-416, or trust combination or division under Section 91-8-417, may be commenced by a trustee or beneficiary. The settlor of a charitable trust may maintain a proceeding to modify the trust under Section 91-8-413.

Nothing in this section or this chapter is intended to create or imply a duty for a trustee to make or seek approval of a modification, termination, combination or division, and a trustee is not liable for not making or seeking approval of a modification, termination, combination or division.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-411.
Modification or termination of noncharitable irrevocable trust by consent.

During the settlor’s lifetime, a noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified or terminated by the trustee upon consent of all qualified beneficiaries, even if the modification or termination is inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust if the settlor does not object to the proposed modification or termination. The trustee shall notify the settlor of the proposed modification or termination not less than sixty (60) days before initiating the modification or termination. The notice of modification or termination must include:

An explanation of the reasons for the proposed modification or termination;

The date on which the proposed modification or termination is anticipated to occur; and

The date, not less than sixty (60) days after the giving of notice, by which the settlor must notify the trustee of an objection to the proposed modification or termination.

Following the settlor’s death, a noncharitable irrevocable trust may be terminated upon consent of all of the qualified beneficiaries if the court concludes that continuance of the trust is not necessary to achieve any material purpose of the trust. A noncharitable irrevocable trust may be modified upon consent of all of the qualified beneficiaries if the court concludes that modification is not inconsistent with a material purpose of the trust.

Upon termination of a trust under subsection (a) or (b), the trustee shall distribute the trust property as agreed by the qualified beneficiaries.

If not all of the qualified beneficiaries consent to a proposed modification or termination of the trust under subsection (a) or (b), the modification or termination may be approved by the court if the court is satisfied that:

If all of the qualified beneficiaries had consented, the trust could have been modified or terminated under this section; and

The interests of a qualified beneficiary who does not consent will be adequately protected.

Solely for purposes of this section, the term “noncharitable irrevocable trust” refers to a trust that is not revocable by the settlor with respect to which:

No federal or state income, gift, estate or inheritance tax charitable deduction was allowed upon transfers to the trust; and

The value of all interests in the trust owned by charitable organizations does not exceed five percent (5%) of the value of the trust.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the trustee may seek court approval of a modification or termination.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 33; Laws, 2016, ch. 396, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-412.
Modification or termination because of unanticipated circumstances or inability to administer trust effectively.

The court may modify the administrative or dispositive terms of a trust or terminate the trust if, because of circumstances not anticipated by the settlor, modification or termination will further the purposes of the trust. To the extent practicable, the modification must be made in accordance with the settlor’s probable intention.

The court may modify the administrative terms of a trust if continuation of the trust on its existing terms would be impracticable or wasteful or impair the trust’s administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property in a manner consistent with the purposes of the trust.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-413.
Cy pres.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), if a particular charitable purpose becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, obsolete or ineffective:

The trust does not fail, in whole or in part;

The trust property does not revert to the settlor or the settlor’s successors in interest; and

The court may apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust by directing that the trust property be applied or distributed, in whole or in part, in a manner that fulfills as nearly as possible the settlor’s charitable intent and purposes.

A provision in the terms of a charitable trust that would result in distribution of the trust property to a noncharitable beneficiary prevails over the power of the court under subsection (a) to apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust only if, when the provision takes effect:

The trust property is to revert to the settlor and the settlor is still living; or

Fewer than twenty-one (21) years have elapsed since the date of the trust’s creation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-414.
Modification or termination of uneconomic trust.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, the trustee of a trust consisting of trust property having a total value less than One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) may terminate the trust if the trustee concludes that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

The court may modify or terminate a trust or remove the trustee and appoint a different trustee if it determines that the value of the trust property is insufficient to justify the cost of administration.

Upon termination of a trust under this section, the trustee shall distribute the trust property to or for the benefit of the beneficiaries, in such shares as the trustee, or the court in a court proceeding, determines, after taking into account the interests of income and remainder beneficiaries so as to conform as nearly as possible to the intention of the settlor, but a trust that qualified for the marital deduction for tax purposes shall only be distributed to the spouse of the settlor for whom the trust was created.

This section does not apply to an easement for conservation or preservation.

This section shall not limit the right of a trustee, acting alone, to terminate a trust in accordance with applicable provisions of the governing instrument.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 36, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-415.
Reformation to correct mistakes.

The court may reform the terms of a trust, even if unambiguous, to conform the terms to the settlor’s intention if it is proved by clear and convincing evidence what the settlor’s intention was and that the terms of the trust were affected by a mistake of fact or law, whether in expression or inducement.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-416.
Modification to achieve settlor’s tax objectives.

To achieve the settlor’s tax objectives, the court may modify the terms of a trust in a manner that is not contrary to the settlor’s probable intention. The court may provide that the modification has retroactive effect.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 91-8-417.
Combination and division of trusts.

After notice to the qualified beneficiaries, a trustee may combine two (2) or more trusts into a single trust or divide a trust into two (2) or more separate trusts, if the result does not impair the rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect achievement of the purposes of the trust. In addition to any other combination or division the result of which does not impair the rights of any beneficiary or adversely affect achievement of the purposes of the trust, a combination or division pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall not be considered as impairing the rights of any beneficiary or adversely affecting the achievement of the purposes of the trust. If the trusts to be combined or divided have different trustees, the trustees may negotiate the terms of the combined or divided trusts, including which trusts will be the surviving trust or trusts, who will be the trustee or trustees of the surviving trust or trusts and any other matter relating to the operation of the surviving trust or trusts.

In addition to combining two (2) or more trusts into a single trust or dividing a trust into two (2) or more separate trusts, a trustee, after notice to the qualified beneficiaries, may segregate by allocation to a separate account or trust a specific amount from, a portion of, or a specific asset included in the trust property of any trust to reflect a disclaimer, to reflect or result in differences in federal tax attributes, to satisfy any federal tax requirement, to make federal tax elections, to reduce potential generation-skipping transfer tax liability, or for any other tax planning purposes or other reasons.

A separate trust created by severance or segregation must be treated as a separate trust for all purposes from the effective date in which the severance or segregation is effective. The effective date of the severance or segregation may be retroactive. In managing, investing, administering, and distributing the trust property of any separate account or trust and in making applicable tax elections, the trustee may consider the differences in federal tax attributes and all other factors the trustee believes pertinent and may make disproportionate distributions from the separate trusts or accounts created.

A trust or account created by consolidation, severance, or segregation under this section shall not be considered as impairing the rights of a beneficiary if the trust is held on terms and conditions that are substantially equivalent to the terms of the trust before consolidation, severance, or segregation so that the aggregate interests of each beneficiary are substantially equivalent to the beneficiary’s interests in the trust or trusts before consolidation, severance, or segregation. In determining whether a beneficiary’s aggregate interests are substantially equivalent, the trustee shall consider the economic value of those interests to the extent they can be valued, considering actuarial factors as appropriate. If a beneficiary’s interest cannot be valued with any reasonable degree of certainty because of the nature of the trust property, the terms of the trust, or other reasons, the trustee shall base the determination upon such other factors as are reasonable and appropriate under the facts and circumstances applicable to that particular trust, including the purposes of the trust. However, the terms of any trust before consolidation, severance or segregation which permit qualification of that trust for an applicable federal tax deduction, exclusion, election, exemption, or other special federal tax status must remain identical in the consolidated trust or in each of the separate trusts or accounts created by severance or segregation.

A trustee who acts in good faith is not liable to any person for taking into consideration differences in federal tax attributes and other pertinent factors in administering trust property of any separate account or trust, in making tax elections, and making distributions pursuant to the terms of the separate trust.

Income earned on a consolidated or severed or segregated amount, portion, or specific asset after the consolidation or severance is effective passes with that amount, portion or specific asset.

This section applies to all trusts whenever created, whether before, on, or after July 1, 2014, and whether the trusts are inter vivos or testamentary, are created by the same or different instruments, by the same or different persons and without regard to where created or administered.

This section does not limit the right of a trustee acting in accordance with the applicable provisions of the governing instrument to divide or consolidate trusts.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as granting to any trustee a general power of appointment over any trust not otherwise expressly granted in the trust instrument.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 39, eff from and after July 1, 2014.